Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska29-4304
Confidential communications; waiver; sections, how construed.

(1) A victim does not waive the protections afforded by sections 29-4301 to 29-4304 by testifying in court about the offense, except that:

(a) If the victim partially discloses the contents of a confidential communication in the course of testifying, then either party may request the court to rule that justice requires the protections afforded by sections 29-4301 to 29-4304 be waived to the extent the protections apply to that portion of the confidential communication; and

(b) Any waiver shall apply only to the extent necessary to require any witness to respond to counsel's questions concerning a confidential communication that is relevant to the case.

(2) An advocate cannot waive the protections afforded a victim under sections 29-4301 to 29-4304. However, if a victim brings suit against an advocate or the agency, business, or organization in which the advocate was employed or served as a volunteer at the time of the advocacy relationship, the advocate may testify or produce records regarding confidential communications with the victim and is not in violation of sections 29-4301 to 29-4304.

(3) Sections 29-4301 to 29-4304 shall not relieve an advocate of any duty to report suspected adult abuse or neglect as required by section 28-372 or suspected child abuse or neglect as required by section 28-711 or any other legal duty to report a criminal or unlawful act.

(4) Sections 29-4301 to 29-4304 shall not be construed to limit any other testimonial privilege available to any person under the laws of this state.

Laws 2004, LB 613, § 4.